Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-602
Chief of police; duties.

The chief of police of a city of the metropolitan class shall have the supervision and control of the police force of the city. All orders relating to the direction of the police force shall be given through the chief of police or, in the chief's absence, the officer in charge of the police force.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. V, § 2, p. 496;

C.S.1922, § 3683;

C.S.1929, § 14-602;

R.S.1943, § 14-602;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 215.
July 21, 2022
It is the duty of mayor and chief of police to interfere actively to prevent open violation of law, and compliance may be compelled by mandamus. Moores v. State ex rel. Dunn, 71 Neb. 522, 99 N.W. 249 (1904).